src/Morphotactics/Morphotactics.lexc
(хвал)		 2/f;
!(хвал҄)		 7;
(хват)		 1; ! 1025
(хват)		 7a; ! 1025
((херовим))	 NU;
((хитон))	 2/m;
(хлад)		 1;
(хлад)		 2/m;
(хлажд)		 r;
(хлап)		 2/m;
(хлащ)		 r;
(хлъм)		 2/m;
(хлѣб)		 2/m; ! 1032
(хлѣв)		 2/m; ! 1033
(хлѧб)		 1/f; ! 1034
об.(хлѧд)	 7a; ! 1035
(хлѫп)		 7; ! 1036
(ход)		 1; ! 1021
(ход)		 2/f; ! 1021
(ход)		 2/m; ! 1021
!(хожд)		 r; ! 1021
!(хажд)		 7; ! 1021
((хорѫг))	 %0/f; ! 1037
(хот)		 %0+; ! 1038
(хот)		 1/f; ! 1038
((храбър))	 2/a; ! 1039
(храм)		 NU; ! 1040
(хран)		 1; ! 1041
!(хран҄)		 r; ! 1041
(хром)		 2/a; ! 1042
(хръм)		 5; ! 1042
((хръзан))	 2/m; ! 1043
!(худ)		 1; ! 1045
(худ)		 2/a; ! 1045
(хул)		 1; ! 1046
(хул)		 2/f; ! 1046
!(хул҄)		 7; ! 1046
(хыз)		 2/m; ! 1047
(хыт)		 1; ! 1048
(хыт)		 7a; ! 1048
(хыт).р		 2/a; ! 1048
!(хыщ)		 7; ! 1048
((хѫдож))	 r;
(хѫп)		 1;
(цвит)		 4c*↪;
(цвѣт)		 2/m;
(црьк)		 %0/f;
(цѣв)		 r; ! 1052
(цѣд)		 1; ! 1053
!(цѣжд)		 7; ! 1053
(цѣл)		 1; ! 1054
(цѣл)		 %0/f; ! 1054
(цѣл)		 2/a; ! 1054
!(цѣл҄)		 7; ! 1054
(цѣн)		 NU; ! 1055
(цѣп)		 7; ! 1056
(цѣп)		 1; ! 1057
(цѣс).ар҄	 2/m+; ! 1058
(цѣст)		 1;
(ча)		 3;
(чар)		 2/m;
(час)		 2/m;
(чаш)		 2/f;
(чез)		 5;
((чел҄уст))	 1/f;
(чес)		 3;
(чет)		 7;
((четвор))	 2/a;
((четврь))	 r;
((четыр))	 %0/a;
((чешу))	 2/f;
(чи)		 4v;
(чин)		 NU; ! 1073
!(чин҄)		 7; ! 1073
(чин)		 7a; ! 1074
(чѧ)		 4h; ! 1074
(чѧ).л		 2/n; ! 1074
(чист)		 1;
(чист)		 2/a;
((чловѣк))	 2/m;
((чловѣч))	 2/a;
!(чрьв)		 1; ! 1078
(чрьв)		 1/m; ! 1078
!(чрьвл҄)	 r; ! 1078
(чрьм)		 RU;	! 1079 Красное (море)
(чрьн)		 2/a;
(чрьп)		 3*;
(чрьт)		 2/f;
((чрьтог))	 2/m;
(чрьщ)		 2/n;
(чрѣв)		 NU;	! 1085
(чрѣв)		 r;
(чрѣд)		 2/f;	! 1087
(чрѣн)		 NU;	! 1089 коренной зуб
(чрѣп)		 4c*↪;
(чу)		 4v;
(чу).д		 2/n;
((чьван))	 2/m;
(чит)		 4c*↪; ! 1076
(чит).т		 menNeutra; ! 1076
(чит).т.л	 2/n; ! 1076
(чьт)		 V; ! 1076
(чьт).т		 1/f; ! 1076
(чьт).ств	 2/n; ! 1076
(чѣз)		 7;
(чѧд)		 1/f;
(чѧд)		 2/n;
(чѧст)		 1;
(чѧст)		 1/f;
!(чѧщ)		 7;
(шар)		 2/m;
(шест)		 1/f;
(шест)		 2/a;
(ши)		 2/f;
(шиб)		 7;
(шид)		 1/m;
(шип)		 NU; ! 1100
(шир)		 ok;
!(шир҄)		 7;
(шлѣм)		 2/m;
(шуj)		 2/a;
(шум)		 2;
(шум)		 2/m;
(шы)		 4h*#↩;
(шьд).ьств	 2/n; ! 1099
(шьп)		 3;
(шѧт)		 7;
(щед).р		 2/a;
(щит)		 1;
(щит)		 2/m;
!(щищ)		 7;
(щут)		 1;
(щѧд)		 2;
(ьм)		 2/m;
(ьм)		 3*;
(ьн).ак		 2/p;
(ьн).ок		 2/m;
(ьн).ьн		 2/a;
(ѕвѣзд)		 2/f;
(ѕѣл)		 2/a;
(ѣ)			 r;
(ѣ)			 %0;
(ѣд)		 %0;
(ѣд)		 2/m;
(ѣдр)		 2/n;
(ѧ)			 4h;
(ѧтр)		 1; ! 1116
!(ѧтр҄)		 7; ! 1116
!(ѧщр҄)		 r; ! 1116
(ѫ)			 7;
(ѫг).ъл		 2/m; ! 1117
(ѫгл)		 1/m; ! 1118
(ѫд)		 RU;	! 1119 удочка
(ѫж)		 2/n;
(ѫз)		 uk;
(ѫз)		 2/f;
(ѫтр)		 2/f;
(ѫтр).об	 2/f;
(ѫч)		 r;

LEXICON %0
Infinitive;
Imperfective;
V;
OpenRoot;

LEXICON %0+
.ѣ		Stem;
V;

LEXICON %0/a
.е	#;
A;

LEXICON %0/f
.ы	#;
.ъв	Femininum;

LEXICON %0/f+
.и	#;
.ер	N;

LEXICON %0/m
.ь	#;
N;

LEXICON %0/n
esNeutra;
enNeutra;
entNeutra;

LEXICON menNeutra
.м	enNeutra;

LEXICON esNeutra
.о	#;
.ес	Neutrum;
Neutrum;

LEXICON enNeutra
.ѧ	#;
.ен	Neutrum;

LEXICON entNeutra
.ѧ	#;
.ѧт	Neutrum;

LEXICON %0/p
.ь	#;

LEXICON %0/s
#;

LEXICON 1
.и	iStem;
!Imperfective;
V;

LEXICON 1/a
.е	#;
A;

LEXICON 1/f
.ь		#;
.ьц		2/f; ! Уменьшительные
!.и		#;	! Pl. t.
N;

LEXICON 1/m
.ь	#;
N;

LEXICON 2
.ѣ	eStem;
V;

LEXICON eStem
Stem;
vaImperfective;

LEXICON 2/a
.ъ	#;
.ь	#;
A;

LEXICON 2/aNoDeriv
.ъ	#;

LEXICON 2/a++
.ь		#;
.ьш		2/a;
A;

LEXICON 2/f
.а	#;
!.ы	#; ! Pl. t.
.ѧ	#; ! Pl. t.
.ьц		2/f; ! Уменьшительные
Femininum;

LEXICON 2/f+
.и	#;
.ѧ	#;
N;

LEXICON 2/m
.ъ	#;
!.и	#; ! Pl. t.
Masculinum;

LEXICON 2/m+
.ь	#;
N;

LEXICON 2/m++
.ъ	#;

LEXICON 2/n
.о	#;
.е	#;
!.а	#;
Neutrum;

LEXICON 2/p
.ъ	#;
.ь	#;
.а	#;
P;

LEXICON 2/p+
.ь	#;
P;

LEXICON 3
.а	Stem;
V;
6;

LEXICON 3*
3;

LEXICON 3h*#
3;

LEXICON 3o
3;

LEXICON 3o*
3;

LEXICON 4
Infinitive;
V;
Imperfective;

LEXICON 4c
.и		DerivedVerb; ! Каузативы
4;
5;

LEXICON 4c*↪
4c;
+ZeroGrade enPart;

LEXICON 4c∇
4c;

LEXICON 4h
4;
OpenRoot;
tPart;

LEXICON 4h*#↩
4h;
+ClosedForm enPart;

LEXICON 4h*↩
4h;
vaImperfective;
+ClosedForm enPart;

LEXICON 4h*↪
4h;

LEXICON 4hj
4h;

LEXICON 4h↩
4h;
vaImperfective;
nPart;

LEXICON 4v
4;
vaImperfective;
OpenRoot;
tPart;
nPart;

LEXICON 4v∇
4v;

LEXICON 5
.н		DerivedClass5;
Imperfective;
V;

LEXICON 6
.ов.а	Stem;
V;

LEXICON 7a
.а	CommonClass7;
V;

LEXICON 7e
.ѣ+Class7	CommonClass7;

LEXICON 7
7a;
7e;
V;

LEXICON DerivedClass5
.ѫ		Stem;
.ов		Stem;

LEXICON Imperfective
.а		DerivedClass7;

LEXICON vaImperfective
.в.а	Stem;

LEXICON DerivedClass7
CommonClass7;

LEXICON CommonClass7
Stem;
vaImperfective;

LEXICON NU
N;
NI;

LEXICON AU
A;
AI;

LEXICON VU
V;
VI;

LEXICON PU
P;
PI;

LEXICON NI
2/f;
2/m;
2/n;
1/f;
%0/n;

LEXICON ok
.ок		2/a;
A;

LEXICON uk
.ък		2/a;
A;

LEXICON ik
.ьк		2/a;
A;

LEXICON in
.ьн҄		2/a;

LEXICON AI
2/a;

LEXICON VI
4;
7;

LEXICON PI
2/p;
2/p+;

LEXICON Femininum
.иц		2/f; ! Уменьшительные
N;

LEXICON Masculinum
.ък		2/m; ! Уменьшительные
.ьц		2/m; ! Уменьшительные
N;

LEXICON Neutrum
.ьц		2/n; ! Уменьшительные
N;

LEXICON OpenRoot
.т		ConsonantizedOpenRoot;

LEXICON ConsonantizedOpenRoot
#;

LEXICON Stative
2;
5;

LEXICON eVerb
2;
7e;
